New Mexico, session 2026, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 64-1-22 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1965, Chapter 34, Section 2) is amended to read: "64-1-22. UNLAWFUL INTERFERENCE WITH THE FLIGHT OF AIRCRAFT.--[Any] A. Unlawful interference with the flight of an aircraft consists of a person discharging a firearm, [or] setting in flight any missile, projectile or object or directing a laser that is intended to strike, interfere with or collide with any flying aircraft [shall be guilty of unlawful interference with the flight of an aircraft], including personnel on board the aircraft. Whoever commits unlawful interference with the flight of an aircraft is guilty of a fourth degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. B. Whoever commits unlawful interference with the flight of an aircraft for a second and subsequent offense is guilty of a third degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. C. Whoever commits unlawful interference with the flight of an aircraft that results in harm to a person on the aircraft that requires medical treatment is guilty of a third degree felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-18-15 NMSA 1978. D. As used in this section, "laser" means a device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic radiation by stimulated emission that emits a beam of light." SECTION 2. REPEAL.--Section 64-1-23 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1965, Chapter 34, Section 3) is repealed. - 2 -